California, session 20252026, AB2689.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 50199.28 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:50199.28. (a) For purposes of implementing Section 42(h)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, for any qualified low-income building where 100 percent of the units, except for any manager’s unit, are restricted to lower income households, as defined in Section 50093, by an enforceable regulatory agreement with a government entity, good cause for nonrenewal of a lease shall include cases where both of the following apply:(1) The household’s income exceeds 140 percent of the area median income for at least two consecutive years.(2) Thirty percent of the household’s monthly income exceeds the fair market rent for the county where the unit is located. greater of the following:(A) The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development’s Fair Market Rent for an equivalent-sized unit for the county where the unit is located, as updated annually.(B) The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development’s Small Area Fair Market Rent for an equivalent-sized unit for the ZIP Code where the unit is located, as updated annually.(b) If, during any income certification, the household’s income exceeds 140 percent of the area median income, the owner shall provide the household with written notice of the household’s income threshold exceedance within 30 days of the certification. The notice shall include a statement that the household’s income exceeds 140 percent of the area median income and that if the household’s income exceeds 140 percent of the area median income for two consecutive years, and if 30 percent of the household’s monthly income exceeds the applicable fair market rent, rent provided by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the owner may have good cause for nonrenewal of the lease pursuant to this section.(c) If paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) are satisfied and the owner elects to not renew the lease pursuant to this section, the owner shall issue a notice of nonrenewal at least 90 days prior to the expiration of the lease term and include a citation to this section as the basis for nonrenewal and a statement that the nonrenewal is for good cause because the household’s income has exceeded 140 percent of the area median income for two consecutive years and 30 percent of the household’s monthly income exceeds the applicable fair market rent for the county. provided by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).